North Carolina, session 2025, HB324.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Of the funds appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department
of Transportation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the sum of eight hundred thousand dollars
($800,000) in nonrecurring funds shall be allocated to the Greensboro Transit Agency to be used
for the following purposes:
North/South Crossmax Orange Bus Route $500,000
Pilot Program to transport high school juniors and seniors
to Guilford Technical Community College campuses $300,000
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H324-v-1*